mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX F0 Y 421
SFX F0 0 а/08 [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 агүйсэн [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 ад [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 адүй [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 арай [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 асай [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 ач [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 а/08 я
SFX F0 0 агүйсэн я
SFX F0 0 ад я
SFX F0 0 адүй я
SFX F0 0 арай я
SFX F0 0 асай я
SFX F0 0 ач я
SFX F0 а уужин [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 а уузай [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 а ууштай [^аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 в [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 м [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 г [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 гтун [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 гч/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 гчдынх/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 гсдынх/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 гчид/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 гсад/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 гчийнх/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 лгүй [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 лтай [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 лгүйгээр [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 мгай [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 мгүй [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 мз [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 мтгай [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 муй [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 мхай [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 н [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 нгаа [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 нгуут/00 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 х/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хаар/08 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хааргүйсэн [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хгүйсэн [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хлаар/00 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хсан [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хтай [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хуй/70 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хуйн [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хуйнх/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хуйц/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хуйцынх/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хул [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хчаа [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хчаан [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 хынх/040870 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 я [аийуяь]
SFX F0 0 юу [аийуяь]
SFX F0 0 гаа/08 [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гаагүйсэн [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гаад [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гаадүй [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гаарай [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гаасай [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гаач [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гуужин [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гуузай [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 гууштай [аийуя][аийу]
SFX F0 0 аа/08 [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 аагүйсэн [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 аад [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 аадүй [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 аарай [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 аасай [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 аач [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 уужин [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 уузай [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 ууштай [^аийуяхь]
SFX F0 0 ав [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ам [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ваас [^ьвмл]
SFX F0 0 вал [^ьвмл]
SFX F0 0 баас [вмл]
SFX F0 0 бал [вмл]
SFX F0 0 авч [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 вч [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 аг [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 агтун [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 агч/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 агчдынх/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 агсдынх/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 агчид/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 агсад/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 агчийнх/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 даг/040870 [^ь]
SFX F0 0 дагсан [^ь]
SFX F0 0 даггүйсэн [^ь]
SFX F0 0 дагийнх/040870 [сзцтхджчш]
SFX F0 0 дгийнх/040870 [^сзцтхджчшь]
SFX F0 0 ж [^дтжзсшцчхь]
SFX F0 0 аж [дтзсц]
SFX F0 0 жухуй [^ь]
SFX F0 0 жээ [^ь]
SFX F0 0 зана [^ь]
SFX F0 0 лаа [^ь]
SFX F0 0 алгүй [^аийуяьхжчш]
SFX F0 0 алтай [^аийуяьхжчш]
SFX F0 0 алгүйгээр [^аийуяьхжчш]
SFX F0 0 маанжин [^ь]
SFX F0 0 маар/08 [^ь]
SFX F0 0 маарсан [^ь]
SFX F0 0 мааргүйсэн [^ь]
SFX F0 0 магц/00 [^ь]
SFX F0 0 амгай [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 амгүй [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 амз [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 амтгай [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 муй [^ь]
SFX F0 0 амхай [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ан [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 на [^ьдзцтсжчш]
SFX F0 0 на [аийуя][дзцтс]
SFX F0 0 ана [^аийуя][дзцтхс]
SFX F0 0 нам [^ь]
SFX F0 0 ангаа [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ангуут/00 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 руун [^ь]
SFX F0 0 саар [^ь]
SFX F0 0 сан/040870 [^ь]
SFX F0 0 санчлан [^ь]
SFX F0 0 саных/040870 [сзцтхджчш]
SFX F0 0 сных/040870 [^ьсзцтхджчш]
SFX F0 0 санууд/040870 [сзцтхджчш]
SFX F0 0 снууд/040870 [^ьсзцтхджчш]
SFX F0 0 су [^ь]
SFX F0 0 сугай [^ь]
SFX F0 0 тал/00 [^ь]
SFX F0 0 тугай [^ь]
SFX F0 0 ах/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахаар/08 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахааргүйсэн [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахгүйсэн [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахлаар/00 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахсан [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахтай [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахуй/70 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахуйн [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахуйнх/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахуйц/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахуйцынх/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахул [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахчаа [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахчаан [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 ахынх/040870 [^аийуяхьжчш]
SFX F0 0 чухуй [^ь]
SFX F0 0 шгүй/73 [^аийуясзцтхджчшь]
SFX F0 0 ъя [^аийуяь]
SFX F0 0 ъюу [^аийуяь]
SFX F0 0 ив [жчш]
SFX F0 0 им [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ивч [жчш]
SFX F0 0 иг [жчш]
SFX F0 0 игтун [жчш]
SFX F0 0 игч/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 игчдынх/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 игсдынх/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 игчид/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 игсад/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 игчийнх/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 иж [жчш]
SFX F0 0 илгүй [жчш]
SFX F0 0 илтай [жчш]
SFX F0 0 илгүйгээр [жчш]
SFX F0 0 имгай [жчш]
SFX F0 0 имгүй [жчш]
SFX F0 0 имз [жчш]
SFX F0 0 имтгай [жчш]
SFX F0 0 имхай [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ин [жчш]
SFX F0 0 на [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ингаа [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ингуут/00 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 их/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихаар/08 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихааргүйсэн [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихгүйсэн [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихлаар/00 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихсан [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихтай [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихуй/70 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихуйн [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихуйнх/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихуйц/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихуйцынх/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихул [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихчаа [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихчаан [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ихынх/040870 [жчш]
SFX F0 0 ишгүй/73 [жчш]
SFX F0 ь иа/08 ь
SFX F0 ь иагүйсэн ь
SFX F0 ь иад ь
SFX F0 ь иадүй ь
SFX F0 ь иарай ь
SFX F0 ь иасай ь
SFX F0 ь иач ь
SFX F0 ь иужин ь
SFX F0 ь иузай ь
SFX F0 ь иуштай ь
SFX F0 ь ив ь
SFX F0 ь им ь
SFX F0 ь иваас ь
SFX F0 ь ивал ь
SFX F0 ь ивч ь
SFX F0 ь иг ь
SFX F0 ь игтун ь
SFX F0 ь игч/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь игчдынх/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь игсдынх/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь игчид/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь игсад/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь игчийнх/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь идаг/040870 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь идагсан [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь идаггүйсэн [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь идгийнх/040870 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь иж [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь ижухуй [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь ижээ [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь изана [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 даг/040870 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 дагсан [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 даггүйсэн [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 дгийнх/040870 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 ж [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 жухуй [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 жээ [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 зана [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь илаа ь
SFX F0 ь илгүй ь
SFX F0 ь илтай ь
SFX F0 ь илгүйгээр ь
SFX F0 ь имаанжин ь
SFX F0 ь имаар/08 ь
SFX F0 ь имаар ь
SFX F0 ь имааргүйсэн ь
SFX F0 ь имагц/00 ь
SFX F0 ь имгай ь
SFX F0 ь имгүй ь
SFX F0 ь имз ь
SFX F0 ь имтгай ь
SFX F0 ь имуй ь
SFX F0 ь имхай ь
SFX F0 ь ин ь
SFX F0 ь ина ь
SFX F0 ь инам ь
SFX F0 ь ингаа ь
SFX F0 ь ингуут/00 ь
SFX F0 ь ируун ь
SFX F0 ь исаар [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь исан/040870 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь исанчлан [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь исных/040870 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь иснууд/040870 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь ису [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь исугай [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь итал/00 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь итугай [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 саар [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 сан/040870 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 санчлан [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 сных/040870 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 снууд/040870 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 су [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 сугай [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 тал/00 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 тугай [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь их/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь ихаар/08 ь
SFX F0 ь ихааргүйсэн ь
SFX F0 ь ихгүйсэн ь
SFX F0 ь ихлаар/00 ь
SFX F0 ь ихсан ь
SFX F0 ь ихтай ь
SFX F0 ь ихуй/70 ь
SFX F0 ь ихуйн ь
SFX F0 ь ихуйнх/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь ихуйц/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь ихуйцынх/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь ихул ь
SFX F0 ь ихчаа ь
SFX F0 ь ихчаан ь
SFX F0 ь ихынх/040870 ь
SFX F0 ь ичухуй [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 ь ишгүй/73 [дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 чухуй [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 шгүй/73 [^дтжзсшцчх]ь
SFX F0 0 /0408 чих
SFX F0 0 ул чих
SFX F0 0 уйц/040870 чих
SFT F0 0 уйцынх/040870 чих
SFX F0 их хаа/08 [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хаагүйсэн [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хаад [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хаадүй [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хаарай [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хаасай [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хаач [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хуужин [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хуузай [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хууштай [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хав [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хам [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хавч [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хаг [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хагтун [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хаж [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их халгүй [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их халтай [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их халгүйгээр [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хамгүй [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хамз [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хангаа [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 их хангуут/00 [^дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аар/08 чих    
SFX F0 0 аа чих
SFX F0 0 аараа чих     
SFX F0 0 аас чих    
SFX F0 0 аасаа чих     
SFX F0 0 ад чих    
SFX F0 0 ыг чих    
SFX F0 0 ыгаа чих     
SFX F0 0 ын чих    
SFX F0 0 ынхаа чих     
SFX F0 0 даа их
SFX F0 0 аа/08 [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аагүйсэн [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аад [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аадүй [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аарай [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аасай [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аач [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 уужин [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 уузай [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 ууштай [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 ав [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 ам [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 авч [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аг [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 агтун [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 аж [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 алгүй [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 алтай [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 алгүйгээр [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 амгүй [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 амз [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 ангаа [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 ангуут/00 [дтжзшцч]чих
SFX F0 0 даг/040870 их
SFX F0 0 дагсан их
SFX F0 0 даггүйсэн их
SFX F0 0 дагийнх/040870 их
SFX F0 0 лаар/00 их
SFX F0 0 тай их
SFX F0 0 чаа их
SFX F0 0 чаан их
SFX F0 0 аа/08 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 аагүйсэн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 аад [^и]х
SFX F0 0 аадүй [^и]х
SFX F0 0 аарай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 аасай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 аач [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ав [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ам [^и]х
SFX F0 0 авч [^и]х
SFX F0 0 аг [^и]х
SFX F0 0 агтун [^и]х
SFX F0 0 агч/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 агчдынх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 агсдынх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 агчид/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 агсад/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 агчийнх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 даг/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 дагсан [^и]х
SFX F0 0 даггүйсэн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 дагийнх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 аж [^и]х
SFX F0 0 алгүй [^и]х
SFX F0 0 алтай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 алгүйгээр [^и]х
SFX F0 0 амгай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 амгүй [^и]х
SFX F0 0 амз [^и]х
SFX F0 0 амтгай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 амхай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ан [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ангаа [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ангуут/00 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ах/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахаар/08 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахааргүйсэн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахгүйсэн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахлаар/00 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахсан [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахтай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуй/70 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйнх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйц/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйцынх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ууштай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 уузай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 хул [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахчаа [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахчаан [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахынх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 чухуй [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ашгүй/73 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 шгүй/73 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 ашгүй/73 [сзцтд]
